North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 22. Review of Criminal Trials. [Repealed]

§ 15-217.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33.

Cross References.

For provisions as to post-trial relief in criminal cases, see

G.S. 15A-1411

et seq.

§ 15-217.1.

Recodified as § 15A-1420(b1) by Session Laws 1995 (Regular Session, 1996), c. 719, s. 3.

§§ 15-218 through 15-222.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33.

Cross References.

For provisions as to post-trial relief in criminal cases, see

G.S. 15A-1411

et seq.